Georgia, session 2025_26, HB629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to health, is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-775, relating to automated
external defibrillators required in high schools, requirements, and funding, as follows:
"20-2-775.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Automated external defibrillator' means a defibrillator which:
(A) Is capable of cardiac rhythm analysis;
(B) Will charge and be capable of being activated to deliver a countershock after
electrically detecting the presence of certain cardiac dysrhythmias; and
H. B. 629
- 1 -

LC 46 1150
(C) Is capable of continuously recording cardiac dysrhythmia at the scene with a
mechanism for transfer and storage or for printing for review subsequent to use.
(2) 'Emergency action plan' means the plan established pursuant to paragraph (5) of
subsection (c) of this Code section to provide for an emergency response to a person in
cardiac arrest.
(3) 'Internal response team' means the team of school personnel established pursuant to
paragraph (7) of subsection (c) of this Code section responsible for oversight of an
emergency response to a person in cardiac arrest and implementation of the emergency
action plan.
(4) 'School' means a public school in this state which provides K-12 education.
(b) No later than July 1, 2025, each school in this state shall have at least one functional
automated external defibrillator on site at such school at all times and easily accessible
during all school hours and during any school related function, including athletic practices,
athletic competitions, and other occasions where students and others will be present, for
use during emergencies.
(c) Each school shall:
(1) Ensure that each member of the internal response team and any other expected users
of the automated external defibrillator receive American Heart Association or American
Red Cross training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator
use or complete an equivalent nationally recognized course;
(2) Notify the appropriate emergency medical services system of the existence and
location of each automated external defibrillator prior to said automated external
defibrillator being placed in use;
(3) Ensure that the automated external defibrillator is maintained and tested according
to the manufacturer's operational guidelines;
(4) Ensure that there is involvement of a licensed physician or other person authorized
by the Georgia Composite Medical Board in the site's automated external defibrillator
H. B. 629
- 2 -

LC 46 1150
program to ensure compliance with requirements for training, notification, and
maintenance;
(5)(4) Establish a written emergency action plan that adheres to nationally recognized
standards and that establishes specific steps to take during a cardiac emergency in a
school setting. Such plan shall be designed to provide for an effective system for
communication between members of the internal response team and other school
officials, ensuring that the internal response team or other designated personnel activate
the emergency medical services system as soon as reasonably possible after any person
renders emergency care or treatment to a person in cardiac arrest by using an automated
external defibrillator and report any clinical use of the automated external defibrillator
to the licensed physician or other person authorized by the Georgia Composite Medical
Board who is supervising the program, and ensuring that emergency medical services
personnel are led directly to the exact location of the person in cardiac arrest;
(6)(5) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, conduct
a minimum of two emergency action plan practice drills per school year, with at least one
per semester. One such practice drill may be a tabletop drill to walk through a
hypothetical scenario and the courses of action a school will need to take before, during,
and after a cardiac emergency. The emergency action plan practice drills shall include
various locations on school grounds and responses to different hypothetical situations;
(7)(6) Establish a designated internal response team composed of:
(A) At least five school staff members;
(B) One or more designated team leads trained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and
automated external defibrillator use and responsible for oversight of an emergency
response;
(C) One or more designated cardiopulmonary resuscitation leads trained in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator use;
H. B. 629
- 3 -

LC 46 1150
(D) One or more designated automated external defibrillator leads, responsible for
knowing the location of automated external defibrillators, retrieving automated external
defibrillators, and maintenance of automated external defibrillators; and
(E) One or more designated communication leads responsible for activating the
emergency medical services system, facilitating directions to the person in cardiac
arrest for emergency medical services personnel upon arrival at the school, and
coordinating communications with the designated team lead or leads; and
(8)(7) Apprise all school personnel of the location of automated external defibrillators
and the members of the internal response team.
(d) Subject to appropriations by the General Assembly, the Department of Education shall
provide funds to local school systems to assist in the purchase of automated external
defibrillators pursuant to this Code section.
(e) The department and local school systems shall use diligent efforts to identify private
sources of funding or donation of funding and equipment to meet the requirements of this
Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 629
- 4 -